ru: Тип установки фильтра: Центральный разветвитель; Стационарное подключение; Встроенный в кабель; Модульный адаптер; Настенная пластина; Настенная розетка; Другой
zh-CN: 滤波器安装类型: 中央分路器; 硬线连接; 内联线缆; 模块化适配器; 墙板; 墙插; 其他
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie filtra: Centrálny rozdeľovač; Pevne zapojený; Vložkový kábel; Modulárny adaptér; Nástenná doska; Nástenná zásuvka; Iné
zh-TW: 濾波器安裝類型: 中央分離器; 硬接線; 串接線; 模組化轉接器; 牆板; 牆插式; 其他
ko: 필터 설치 유형: 중앙 분배기; 하드와이어드; 인라인 코드; 모듈러 어댑터; 벽면 플레이트; 벽면 플러그인; 기타
ja: フィルターの設置タイプ: セントラルスプリッター; ハードワイヤード; インラインコード; モジュラーアダプター; ウォールプレート; 壁コンセント式; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de instalação do filtro: Divisor central; Instalação fixa; Cabo em linha; Adaptador modular; Placa de parede; Plugue de parede; Outro
nl: Type filterinstallatie: Centrale splitter; Vast bekabeld; Inline snoer; Modulaire adapter; Wandplaat; Wandstekker; Andere
da: Filterinstallationstype: Central splitter; Fastkoblet; Inline-ledning; Modulær adapter; Vægplade; Vægstik; Andet
fr: Type d’installation du filtre: Séparateur central; Câblage fixe; Cordon en ligne; Adaptateur modulaire; Plaque murale; Prise murale; Autre
hr-HR: Tip instalacije filtera: Središnji razdjelnik; Ugrađeno ožičenje; Linijski kabel; Modularni adapter; Zidna ploča; Zidni utikač; Ostalo
tr: Filtre kurulum tipi: Merkezi ayırıcı; Sabit kablolu; Hat içi kablo; Modüler adaptör; Duvar plakası; Duvar prizi; Diğer
cs: Typ instalace filtru: Centrální rozbočovač; Napevno zapojený; Vložený do kabelu; Modulární adaptér; Nástěnná deska; Zásuvkový do zdi; Jiné
sl-SI: Tip namestitve filtra: Centralni razdelilnik; Trdo ožičeno; Vrvica v liniji; Modularni adapter; Stenska plošča; Stenski vtič; Drugo
pl: Typ instalacji filtra: Centralny rozdzielacz; Na stałe podłączony; Przewód liniowy; Adapter modułowy; Płytka ścienna; Wtyczka ścienna; Inne
de: Einbauart des Filters: Zentraler Splitter; Festverdrahtet; Inline-Kabel; Modularer Adapter; Wandplatte; Wandstecker; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de instalación del filtro: Divisor central; Cableado fijo; Cable en línea; Adaptador modular; Placa de pared; Enchufe de pared; Otros
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης φίλτρου: Κεντρικός διαχωριστής; Σκληρή καλωδίωση; Ενσωματωμένο καλώδιο; Αρθρωτός προσαρμογέας; Επιτοίχια πλάκα; Επιτοίχια πρίζα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de instalare a filtrului: Separator central; Cablat direct; Cablu inline; Adaptor modular; Placă de perete; Priză de perete; Altele
nb: Filterinstallasjonstype: Sentral splitter; Fastkoblet; Innebygd ledning; Modulær adapter; Veggplate; Veggplugg; Annet
en: Filter installation type: Central splitter; Hardwired; Inline cord; Modular adapter; Wall plate; Wall plug-in; Other
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งฟิลเตอร์: ตัวแยกส่วนกลาง; เดินสายตรง; สายอินไลน์; อะแดปเตอร์แบบโมดูลาร์; แผ่นผนัง; เสียบผนัง; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại lắp đặt bộ lọc: Bộ chia trung tâm; Đấu dây cứng; Dây nối tiếp; Bộ chuyển đổi module; Mặt tường; Cắm tường; Khác
it: Tipo di installazione del filtro: Splitter centrale; Cablato; Cavo in linea; Adattatore modulare; Placca da parete; Spina da parete; Altro
bg-BG: Тип инсталация на филтъра: Централен разделител; Твърдо свързан; Вграден кабел; Модулен адаптер; Стенна плоча; Стенен щепсел; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do filtro: Divisor central; Cablagem fixa; Cabo em linha; Adaptador modular; Placa de parede; Ficha de parede; Outro
lt-LT: Filtro montavimo tipas: Centrinis dalytuvas; Kietai sujungtas; Tiesioginė jungtis; Modulinis adapteris; Sieninė plokštelė; Sieninis kištukas; Kita
fi: Suodattimen asennustyyppi: Keskusjakaja; Kiinteästi kytketty; Välissä oleva johto; Modulaarinen sovitin; Seinälevy; Seinäpistoke; Muu
hu: Szűrő telepítési típusa: Központi elosztó; Fix bekötött; Beépített vezeték; Moduláris adapter; Fali csatlakozó; Fali dugaszolható; Egyéb
sv: Filterinstallationstyp: Central splitter; Hårdkopplad; Inline-sladd; Modulär adapter; Väggplatta; Väggkontakt; Övrigt